Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Borrowing

Cross references. —

As to borrowing by bank, see §

13-3-203

.

§ 13-7-401.
Debenture bonds.

Except as provided in W.S.

13-7-102

, any savings and loan association may issue its debenture bonds maturing not later than five (5) years from the date of issue and bearing interest not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum. No bonds shall be issued unless there are sufficient funds on hand or receivable in time to meet approved applications for loans or for the payment of withdrawals of accounts. Debenture bonds may be retired by action of the board of directors at any time after one (1) year from date of issue by the secretary of the association giving notice in writing sixty (60) days or more prior to the next interest date to the recorded holders of the bonds. On return of the retired bonds together with any coupons, holders shall receive the par value of the bonds. At the expiration of the next interest period the bonds called shall cease to draw interest.

Whenever the state banking commissioner deems any indebtedness incurred under the provisions of this section to be detrimental to the interest of the association, he shall notify the association to reduce its indebtedness to an amount he considers reasonable, giving the association reasonable time to effect the reduction of indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-7-402.
Borrowing from federal home loan bank.

Any state savings and loan association may borrow money from the federal home loan bank, when authorized by resolution of its board of directors, upon terms and rates of interest as may be agreed upon. It may assign and pledge its notes, bonds, mortgages or other property and repledge the shares of stock or savings certificates pledged to it as collateral security without securing the consent of the owner as security for the repayment of its indebtedness. Any lawful holder of any evidence of indebtedness due to an association may enforce, in his own name or in the name of the association, all appropriate remedies to enforce collection, whether or not the stock or savings certificate described in connection with the note is held by the pledgee or holder.

Any obligation incurred or loan made by an association constitutes a claim against the corporate assets and is payable in advance of, and by preference over, all claims or rights of the shareholders or holders of savings certificates in any of the assets of the association. These obligations are senior to any demand for the withdrawal or cancellation of all classes of shares or savings certificates in the association including matured shares or savings certificates.

The existence of a withdrawal list consisting of members desiring to withdraw from the association does not prevent the board of directors of the association from borrowing money from the federal home loan bank to be used solely for the purpose of making mortgage loans to the members of the association, but all borrowed money shall be exclusively used for the purpose borrowed. A savings and loan association shall not at any time borrow money from the federal home loan bank in an amount exceeding any limit fixed by the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 108, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 36-503; W.S. 1957, § 13-277; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.